Georgia, session 2025_26, HB239.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
The General Assembly recognizes that the number of alternative fueled vehicles operating
on Georgia's highways continues to grow. Alternative fueled vehicles pose a unique
challenge to first responders, as different types of fuel can require specific safety procedures
in instances of an accident. Many alternative fueled vehicles are indistinguishable from
traditional gasoline powered vehicles. Requiring a special sticker to identify a vehicle as an
alternative vehicle and what type of fuel is used would assist first responders in quickly
H. B. 239
- 1 -

LC 39 4553
determining the appropriate response measures to be taken after an accident. Such stickers
are necessary for the safety of first responders and the general public.
SECTION 2.
Title 40 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to motor vehicles and traffic, is
amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"40-1-10.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Alternative fueled vehicle' means a motor vehicle with a gross weight of 10,000
pounds or less fueled exclusively or partially by electricity, natural gas, hydrogen, or
propane.
(2) 'Alternative fueled vehicle sticker' means a sticker approved and provided by the
department designating a motor vehicle as an alternative fueled vehicle.
(3) 'Department' means the Department of Revenue.
(b) Upon approval of an application for the initial registration or renewal registration of
a motor vehicle that is an alternative fueled vehicle and payment of a fee of $3.00, the
department shall provide the owner with two alternative fueled vehicle stickers.
Alternative fueled vehicle stickers shall be of a design and material approved by the
department, provided that a separate design shall be used for each type of alternative fuel
and such stickers shall be of a size suitable for placement in the bottom corner of a
windshield with minimal obstruction of view for an operator. The department shall take
into consideration design standards set by the Society of Automotive Engineers in
designing alternative fueled vehicle stickers.
(c) Any person who owns an alternative fueled vehicle registered in this state shall affix
alternative fueled vehicle stickers to the bottom corner of the driver's side of the front and
rear windshield.
H. B. 239
- 2 -

LC 39 4553
(d)(1) Except as otherwise provided for in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a person who
fails to identify an alternative fueled vehicle as required in subsection (c) of this Code
section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished
by a fine not exceeding $100.00.
(2) The requirement set forth in subsection (c) of this Code section shall not apply:
(A) Within the first 45 days of any initial purchase of an alternative fueled vehicle; or
(B) Until an owner's registration period expires for an alternative fueled vehicle that
was registered in this state prior to January 1, 2026."
SECTION 3.
Said title is further amended in Code Section 40-2-26, relating to form and contents of
application for registration, heavy vehicle tax, and satisfactory proof of insurance coverage,
by revising paragraph (1) of subsection (b) as follows:
"(b)(1) Application shall be made by the owner of the vehicle upon a form prepared by
the commissioner for such purposes setting forth the name, place of residence, and
address of the applicant; a brief description of the vehicle to be registered, including its
name and model, the name of the manufacturer, the manufacturer's vehicle identification
number, and its shipping weight and carrying capacity, and whether it is an alternative
fueled vehicle as such term is defined in Code Section 40-1-10; from whom, where, and
when the vehicle was purchased; the total amount of all liens, if any, thereon, with the
name and address of the lienholder; and such other information as the commissioner may
require. Such application shall include a method for indicating whether the application
is for a digital license plate issued pursuant to Article 2B of this chapter."
SECTION 4.
This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026.
H. B. 239
- 3 -

LC 39 4553
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 239
- 4 -